Utah statutes.
75-2-1207.   Prospective application.

(1) (a)  Except as extended by Subsection (2), this section applies to a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment that is created on or after December 31, 2003.

(b)  For purposes of this section, a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment created by the exercise of a power of appointment is created when:

(i)  the power is irrevocably exercised; or

(ii)  a revocable exercise becomes irrevocable.

(2)  If a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment was created before December 31, 2003, and is determined in a judicial proceeding, commenced on or after December 31, 2003, to violate Utah's rule against perpetuities as that rule existed before December 31, 2003, a court upon the petition of an interested person may reform the disposition:

(a)  in the manner that most closely approximates the transferor's manifested plan of distribution; and

(b)  that is within the limits of the rule against perpetuities applicable when the nonvested property interest or power of appointment was created.

(3)  Section 75-2-1203 applies to a trust instrument or conveyance executed on or after December 31, 2003, if the trust instrument or conveyance creates a contingent power of appointment or nonvested property interest subject to the exercise of a power of appointment that creates a new or successive power of appointment.

